Rhode Island, session 2025, SB70.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:

SECTION 1. Section 28-14-12 of the General Laws in Chapter 28-14 entitled "Payment of
Wages" is hereby amended to read as follows:
28-14-12. Employment records.
(a) Every employer shall keep a true and accurate record of hours worked and wages paid
each pay period to each employee in any form that may be prescribed by the director. The employer
shall keep the records on file for at least three (3) years after the entry of the record. At the start of
employment, an employer shall provide each of its employees, a written notice, in English,
containing the following information:
(1) The rate or rates of pay and basis thereof, including whether the employee is to be paid
by the hour, shift, day, week, salary, piece, commission, or other method, and the specific
application of any additional rates;
(2) Allowances, if any, claimed, pursuant to permitted meals and lodging;
(3) Employer's policy on sick, vacation, personal leave, holidays and hours;
(4) The employee's employment status and whether the employee is exempt from minimum
wage and/or overtime;
(5) A list of deductions that may be made from the employee's pay;
(6) The number of days in the pay period, the regularly scheduled payday, and the payday
on which the employee will receive the first payment of wages earned;

(7) The legal name of the employer and the operating name of the employer, if different
from its legal name;
(8) The physical address of the employer's main office or principal place of business, and
its mailing address if different; and
(9) The telephone number of the employer.
(b) The employer shall keep a copy of the notice provided pursuant to the provisions of
subsection (a) of this section, signed by each employee, thereby acknowledging their receipt of the
notice.
(c) Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be punished by a fine of
four hundred dollars ($400) for a first or second violation and any subsequent violation shall be
subject to the penalties provided in § 28-14-17(a).
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC000210/SUB A
========
LC000210/SUB A - Page 2 of 3